Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 8 Arrest and Preliminary Hearing

Cross references. —

As to arrests by peace officer, see §§

7-2-102

and

7-2-103

.

As to exemption of witnesses coming into state to testify from arrest, see §

7-11-406

.

As to preliminary hearings in circuit courts, see §

5-9-132

.

As to preliminary examination, see Rule 5.1, W.R. Cr. P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

5 Am. Jur. 2d Arrest §§ 3 to 51, 69 to 94; 21 Am. Jur. 2d Criminal Law §§ 550 to 790; 68 Am. Jur. 2d Searches and Seizures §§ 66 to 73.

Private citizen's right to institute mandamus to compel a magistrate or other appropriate official to issue a warrant for an arrest, 49 ALR2d 1285.

Peace officer's delay in making arrest without warrant for misdemeanor or breach of peace committed in his presence, 58 ALR2d 1056.

Delay between filing of complaint or other charge and arrest of accused as violation of right to speedy trial, 85 ALR2d 980.

Right of person accused of crime to exclude public from preliminary hearing or examination, 31 ALR3d 816.

Right to forcefully resist illegal arrest, 44 ALR3d 1078.

Principal's liability for punitive damages because of false arrest or imprisonment, or malicious prosecution, by agent or employee, 93 ALR3d 826.

Defendant's state of mind necessary or sufficient to warrant award of punitive damages in action for false arrest or imprisonment, 93 ALR3d 1109.

Validity of arrest made in reliance upon uncorrected or outdated warrant, list or similar police record, 45 ALR4th 550.

When does police officer's use of force during arrest become so excessive as to constitute violation of constitutional rights, imposing liability under Federal Civil Rights Act of 1871 (42 USC § 1983), 60 ALR Fed 204.

Civil liability of witness in action under 42 USC § 1983 for deprivation of civil rights, based on testimony given at pretrial criminal proceeding, 94 ALR Fed 892.

6 C.J.S. Arrests § 1 et seq.; 22 C.J.S. Criminal Law §§ 168 to 170, 321 to 351.

§ 7-8-101.
Arrest by private person.

A person who is not a peace officer may arrest another for:

A felony committed in his presence;

A felony which has been committed, even though not in his presence, if he has probable cause to believe the person to be arrested committed it; or

The following misdemeanors committed in his presence:

A misdemeanor theft offense defined by W.S.

6-3-402

; or

A misdemeanor property destruction offense defined by W.S.

6-3-201

.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 21; R.S. 1887, § 3179; R.S. 1899, § 5216; C.S. 1910, § 6053; C.S. 1920, § 7350; R.S. 1931, § 33-113; C.S. 1945, § 10-302; W.S. 1957, § 7-156; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 2013 ch. 191, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to power of railroad conductor to make arrest as special constable in connection with unlawful riding of trains, see §

37-12-106

.

As to power of water commissioners or their assistants to arrest persons, see §

41-3-605

.

The 2013 amendment,

in (a)(iii)(A), substituted “theft” for “larceny” and “6-3-402” for “6-3-402(a) or (e).”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Misdemeanor DWUI. —

This statute does not apply where a campus police officer makes an arrest for misdemeanor driving while under the influence. Marshall v. State ex rel. DOT, 941 P.2d 42,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1997).

Cited

in

State v. Young, 40 Wyo. 508, 281 P. 17,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(1929).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Private person's authority, in making arrest for felony, to shoot or kill alleged felon, 32 ALR3d 1078.

§ 7-8-102.
Issuance and execution of warrant or summons on indictment; procedures governed by rules.

A warrant or summons may be issued on an indictment found in any county.

The warrant may be executed or the summons may be served at any place within the state.

Procedures relating to the issuance, form, execution or service and the return of the warrant or summons shall be governed by the Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 95; R.S. 1887, § 3255; R.S. 1899, § 5314; C.S. 1910, § 6178; C.S. 1920, § 7475; R.S. 1931, § 33-428; C.S. 1945, § 10-801; W.S. 1957, § 7-158; W.S. 1977, §

7-8-103

; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to warrant or summons on indictment, see Rule 9, W.R. Cr. P.

Court is authorized to send its warrant into any county

for the arrest of the defendant. State v. Keefe, 17 Wyo. 227, 98 P. 122,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1908) (decided prior to 1987 revision of this title).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to waive indictment or other formal accusation, 56 ALR2d 837.

§ 7-8-103.
Issuance and execution of warrant or summons on information or complaint; procedures governed by rules.

A warrant or summons issued by any circuit court based upon a complaint or information charging any criminal offense may be executed or served at any place within the jurisdiction of the state of Wyoming.

Procedures relating to the issuance, form, execution or service and the return of the warrant or summons shall be governed by rules promulgated by the supreme court of Wyoming.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 25; R.S. 1887, § 3183; R.S. 1899, § 5211; C.S. 1910, § 6048; C.S. 1920, § 7345; R.S. 1931, § 33-108; C.S. 1945, § 10-306; W.S. 1957, § 7-162; W.S. 1977, § 7-8-107; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to warrant or summons upon complaint, see Rule 4, W.R. Cr. P.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), deleted “justice of the peace court or” following “issued by any.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Quoted

in

Van Horn v. State, 802 P.2d 883,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1990).

Cited

in

Katona v. City of Cheyenne, 686 F. Supp. 287, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 4215 (D. Wyo. 1988).

§ 7-8-104.
Authority of officer to break open building in execution of warrant.

In executing a warrant for the arrest of a person charged with an offense, a peace officer may break open a door or window of any building in which the person to be arrested is or is reasonably believed to be, if the officer is not admitted after he has announced his authority and purpose.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 28; R.S. 1887, § 3186; R.S. 1899, § 5214; C.S. 1910, § 6051; C.S. 1920, § 7348; R.S. 1931, § 33-111; C.S. 1945, § 10-309; W.S. 1957, § 7-165; W.S. 1977, § 7-8-110; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of peace officer to enter private house or enclosure for purpose of making arrest without a warrant for a suspected misdemeanor, 76 ALR2d 1432.

Sufficiency of showing of reasonable belief of danger to officers or others excusing compliance with “knock and announce” requirement — state criminal cases, 17 ALR4th 301.

§ 7-8-105.
Right to preliminary hearing.

In all cases triable in district court, except upon indictment, the defendant is entitled to a preliminary hearing.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 7-8-124; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Quoted

in

Yellowbear v. State, 2008 WY 4, 174 P.3d 1270,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Jan. 14, 2008).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of consideration of credibility of witness in determining probable cause at state preliminary hearing, 84 ALR3d 811.

§ 7-8-106.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as

7-1-109

by Laws 1993, ch. 173, § 1.